Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 97B.037, is amended to read: 97B.037 CROSSBOW HUNTING AND FISHING. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end Notwithstanding section 97B.035, subdivisions 1 and 2, a person may take deer, bear, turkey, common carp, or native rough fish by crossbow during the respective regular archery seasons. The transportation requirements of section 97B.051 apply to crossbows during the regular archery deer, bear, turkey, common carp, or native rough fish season. Crossbows must meet the requirements of section 97B.106, subdivision 2. A person taking deer, bear, turkey, common carp, or native rough fish by crossbow under this section must have a valid license to take the respective game. deleted text begin (b) This section expires June 30, 2026. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end